apertium-en-sq.sq.dix
    <pardef n="let/ër__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rës</l>
          <r>ër<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
          <r>ër<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>ër<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ër</l>
          <r>ër<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rës</l>
          <r>ër<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
          <r>ër<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rën</l>
          <r>ër<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ër</l>
          <r>ër<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rave</l>
          <r>ër<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rave</l>
          <r>ër<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rash</l>
          <r>ër<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rat</l>
          <r>ër<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>ër<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rave</l>
          <r>ër<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rave</l>
          <r>ër<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rat</l>
          <r>ër<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>ër<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="lib/ër__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rit</l>
          <r>ër<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ri</l>
          <r>ër<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ri</l>
          <r>ër<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ër</l>
          <r>ër<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rit</l>
          <r>ër<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ri</l>
          <r>ër<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rin</l>
          <r>ër<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ër</l>
          <r>ër<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rave</l>
          <r>ër<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rave</l>
          <r>ër<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rash</l>
          <r>ër<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rat</l>
          <r>ër<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>ër<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rave</l>
          <r>ër<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rave</l>
          <r>ër<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rat</l>
          <r>ër<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>ër<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mi/k__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kut</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ku</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ku</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>k</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kut</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ku</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kun</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>k</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>qve</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>qve</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>qsh</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>qtë</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>q</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>qve</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>qve</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>qtë</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>q</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="mik"><i>mi</i><par n="mi/k__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="libër"><i>lib</i><par n="lib/ër__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="letër"><i>let</i><par n="let/ër__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="qëndër"><i>qënd</i><par n="let/ër__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="mbiemër"><i>mbiem</i><par n="lib/ër__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="numër"><i>num</i><par n="lib/ër__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="armik"><i>armi</i><par n="mi/k__n_m"/></e>
